District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.14

Rules; fees.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§  2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this part, including establishing permit fees and other fees necessary to support the implementation of this part.

(b)

The Mayor may require reimbursement of costs for services, including inspections, sample collection, document review, or other reasonable costs or fees incurred in implementing this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part.

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 204, 61 DCR 6767